test/src/morphology/V-tegemae81_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tegemä: # Verb (81) tegemä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tegemä+V+Inf/mA: tegemä
     tegemä+V+Inf: tetäq
     tegemä+V+ActPrtPrc: tennüq
     tegemä+V+PssPrtPrc: tett
     tegemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: tii
     tegemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: tege
     tegemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [teie, tei, tekse]
     tegemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [tekkʼ, tegi, tekse]
